Wyoming, session 2025, SF0136.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-11-105(a) by creating a new
paragraph (xlvi) and 39-13-102(k) are amended to read:

39-11-105. Exemptions.

(a) The following property is exempt from property
taxation:

SF0136

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0019
(xlvi) A portion of a single family residential
structure as a homeowner tax exemption as provided in this
paragraph. The following shall apply to this exemption:

(A) The amount of the exemption under this
paragraph shall be twenty-five percent (25%) of the fair
market value of a single family residential structure,
provided that the exemption shall only apply to the first
two million dollars ($2,000,000.00) of the fair market
value of the single family residential structure;

(B) As used in this paragraph, "single
family residential structure" means a structure intended
for human habitation including a house, modular home,
mobile home, townhouse or condominium that is a privately
owned single family dwelling unit;

(C) The county treasurer for each county
shall keep accurate records of the reduction in tax
revenues caused by the homeowner tax exemption provided for
in this paragraph for the county and for each governmental
entity for which a tax levy report is made pursuant to W.S.
39‑13‑104(k) and shall report that information to the
SF0136

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0019
department. The department shall compile and verify the
information received from each county and shall verify any
reductions in the distribution of mill levies to the school
foundation program account under W.S. 21-13-303. Subject to
appropriation of funds by the legislature, the department
shall distribute verified amounts to each county treasurer
for distribution as provided in W.S. 39‑13‑111 in an amount
necessary to fully compensate each government entity for
the reduction in tax revenues. If funds appropriated by the
legislature for distribution under this subparagraph are
insufficient to complete all necessary distributions, there
is appropriated to the department of revenue from the
legislative stabilization reserve account an amount equal
to the amount by which legislative appropriations are
insufficient to make distributions necessary under this
subparagraph for the current tax year. The department shall
transfer this legislative stabilization reserve account
appropriation to each county for distribution to each
government entity in an amount necessary to fully
compensate each government entity for the reduction in tax
revenues. No appropriation from the legislative
stabilization reserve account shall be authorized under
this paragraph after June 30, 2027 and no appropriation
SF0136

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0019
under this subparagraph shall exceed one hundred million
dollars ($100,000,000.00). If the amount available under
this subparagraph is insufficient to fully compensate each
government entity for the reduction in tax revenues, the
department shall distribute funds to each government entity
on a pro rata basis;

(D) This paragraph is repealed on July 1,
2027 and the exemption under this paragraph shall not apply
for tax year 2027 and thereafter.

39-13-102. Administration; confidentiality.

(k) On or before September 1, county assessors shall
certify the exemptions granted pursuant to W.S.
39-11-105(a)(xxiv) and (xlvi) to the department. On or
before October 1 the state treasurer out of funds
appropriated for that purpose shall reimburse each county
treasurer for the amount of taxes which would have been
collected if the property was not exempt. The county
treasurer shall distribute the revenue to each governmental
entity in the actual amount of taxes lost due to the
exemption.
SF0136

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0019

Section 2. The exemption provided by this act shall
first apply to the tax year beginning January 1, 2025.

Section 3. There is appropriated one hundred
twenty-five million dollars ($125,000,000.00) from the
general fund to the department of revenue for the purposes
of reimbursing government entities, including school
districts, for losses in revenue resulting from the
homeowner tax exemption as provided in this act. This
appropriation shall be for the period beginning with the
effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2027. This
appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any
other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds
remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided
by law on June 30, 2027. It is the intent of the
legislature that this appropriation not be included in the
department's standard budget for the immediately succeeding
fiscal biennium.

SF0136

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0019
Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
SF0136